en: E450(iii), Tetrasodium diphosphate, Tetrasodium pyrophosphate, Tetrasodium disphosphate, Tetrasodium diphosphate, sodium pyrophosphate, TSPP, e450iii
xx: E450(iii)
ar: E450(iii), بيروفوسفات صوديوم
bg: E450(iii), Тетранатриев дифосфат, Тетранатриев пирофосфат, тетранатриев дифосфат, натриев пирофосфат
cs: E450(iii), Difosforečnan sodný, Pyrofosforečnan tetrasodný, difosforečnan sodný
da: E450(iii), Tetranatriumdiphosphat, Tetranatriumpyrophosphat, tetranatriumdiphosphat
de: E450(iii), Tetranatriumdiphosphat, Tetranatriumpyrophosphat, Tetranatriumdiphosphat
el: E450(iii), Πυροφωσφορικο νατριο, Πυροφωσφορικό άλας νατρίου, διφωσφορικό νάτριο
eo: E450(iii), Natria pirofosfato
es: E450(iii), Difosfato tetrasódico, Pirofosfato tetrasódico, difosfato de tetrasodio, Pirofosfato sódico
et: E450(iii), Tetranaatriumdifosfaat
fa: E450(iii), تتراسدیوم پیروفسفات
fi: E450(iii), Tetranatriumdifosfaatti, Tetranatriumdifosfaattia, Natriumpyrofosfaatti
fr: E450(iii), Diphosphate tétrasodique, Tetra-sodium pyrophosphate, CAS 7722-88-5, Pyrophosphate tétrasodique
hr: E450(iii), tetranatrijev difosfat
hu: E450(iii), Tetranátrium-difoszfát, Tetranátrium-pirofoszfát, Tetranátrium-difoszfát
it: E450(iii), Difosfato tetrasodico, Pirofosfato tetrasodico, disfosfato tetrasodico, Pirofosfato di sodio
lt: E450(iii), Tetranatrio difosfatas, Tetranatrio pirofosfatas, tetranatrio difosfatas
lv: E450(iii), Tetranātrija difosfāts, Tetranātrija pirofosfāts, Tetranātrija difosfāts
mt: E450(iii), Difosfat tetrasodiku, Pirofosfat tetrasodiku, Disfosfat tetrasodiku
nl: E450(iii), Tetranatriumdifosfaat, Tetranatriumpyrofosfaat
pl: E450(iii), Difosforan tetrasodowy, Pirofosforan czterosodowy, difosforan czterosodowy, pirofosforan sodu
pt: E450(iii), Difosfato tetrassódico, Pirofosfato tetrassódico, difosfato de tetrassódio
ro: E450(iii), Difosfat tetrasodic, Pirofosfat tetrasodic, Difosfat tetrasodic
ru: E450(iii), E450III, Пирофосфат натрия, Пирофосфат тетранатрия, e450iii
sh: E450(iii), etranatrijum pirofosfat
sk: E450(iii), Difosforečnan tetrasodný, Pyrofosforečnan tetrasodný, difosforečnan tetrasodný
sl: E450(iii), Tetranatrijev difosfat, tetranatrijev pirofosfat, tetranatrijev difosfat
sr: E450(iii), Tetranatrijum pirofosfat
sv: E450(iii), Tetranatriumdifosfat, Tetranatriumpyrofosfat, Natriumpyrofosfat
vi: E450(iii), Natri pyrophotphat
zh: E450(iii), 焦磷酸钠

en: E450(iv), dipotassium dihydrogenpyrophosphate, E450iv, E-450iv
xx: E450(iv)
ar: E450(iv), ثنائي هيدروجين بيروفوسفات ثنائي البوتاسيوم
bg: E450(iv), Дикалиев дихидрогенпирофосфат
ca: E450(iv), Dihidrogenpirofosfat dipotàssic
cs: E450(iv), Dihydrogendifosforečnan didraselný
da: E450(iv), Dikaliumdihydrogendiphosphat
de: E450(iv), Dikaliumdihydrogendiphosphat
el: E450(iv), Διϋδρογονοπυροφωσφορικό διποτάσσιο
eo: E450(iv), Dukalia dihidrogena pirofosfato
es: E450(iv), Difosfato dipotásico, E450iv, E-450iv
et: E450(iv), Dikaaliumdivesinikpürofosfaat
fi: E450(iv), Dikaliumdivetypyrofosfaatti, Dikaliumdivetypyrofosfaattia
fr: E450(iv), Diphosphate dipotasique, CAS 14691-84-0, E450iv, E-450iv
hr: E450(iv), Dikalijev dihidrogen pirofosfat, dikalijev dihidrogenpirofosfat
hu: E450(iv), Dikalium-dihidrogén-pirofoszfát
it: E450(iv), Diidrogenopirofosfato dipotassico
ja: E450(iv), 二カリウム二水素ピロリン酸
ko: E450(iv), 이칼륨 이수소 피로인산
lt: E450(iv), Dikalio dihidrogeno pirofosfatas
lv: E450(iv), Dikālija dihidrogēnpirofosfāts
mk: E450(iv), Дикалиум дихидроген пирофосфат
mt: E450(iv), Dihidroġenpirofosfat dipotassiku
nl: E450(iv), Dikaliumdiwaterstofpyrofosfaat
pl: E450(iv), Dihydrogenopirofosforan dipotasowy
pt: E450(iv), Dihidrogenopirofosfato dipotássico
ro: E450(iv), Dihidrogen pirofosfat dipotasic
ru: E450(iv), Дигидропирофосфат дикалия
sk: E450(iv), Dihydrogénpyrofosforečnan didraselný
sl: E450(iv), Dikalijev dihidrogen pirofosfat
sv: E450(iv), Dikaliumdivätepyrofosfat
tr: E450(iv), Dipotasyum dihidrojen pirofosfat
uk: E450(iv), Дикалій дигідроген пірофосфат
zh: E450(iv), 焦磷酸二氢二钾

en: E450(v), Tetrapotassium diphosphate, tetrapotassium pyrophosphate, e450v
xx: E450(v)
bg: E450(v), Тетракалиев дифосфат
cs: E450(v), Difosforečnan draselný, Pyrofosforečnan draselný
da: E450(v), Tetrakaliumdiphosphat
de: E450(v), Tetrakaliumdiphosphat
el: E450(v), Πυροφωσφορικο καλιο
es: E450(v), Difosfato tetrapotásico
et: E450(v), Tetrakaaliumdifosfaat
fi: E450(v), Tetrakaliumdifosfaatti, Tetrakaliumdifosfaattia
fr: E450(v), Diphosphate tétrapotassique, Tetra-potassium pyrophosphate, CAS 7320-34-5
hr: E450(v), tetrakalijev difosfat
hu: E450(v), Tetrakálium-difoszfát
it: E450(v), Difosfato di tetrapotassio
lt: E450(v), Tetrakalio difosfatas
lv: E450(v), Tetrakālija difosfāts
mt: E450(v), Difosfat tetrapotassiku
nl: E450(v), Tetrakaliumdifosfaat
pl: E450(v), Difosforan tetrapotasowy
pt: E450(v), Difosfato tetrapotássico
ro: E450(v), Difosfat tetrapotasic
sk: E450(v), Difosforečnan tetradraselný
sl: E450(v), Tetrakalijev difosfat
sv: E450(v), Tetrakaliumdifosfat

en: E450(vi), Dicalcium diphosphate, dicalcium pyrophosphate, e450vi
xx: E450(vi)
bg: E450(vi), Дикалциев дифосфат
cs: E450(vi), Difosforečnan vápenatý
da: E450(vi), Dicalciumdiphosphat
de: E450(vi), Dicalciumdiphosphat
el: E450(vi), Πυροφωσφορικο ασβεστιο
es: E450(vi), Difosfato dicálcico
et: E450(vi), Dikaltsiumdifosfaat
fi: E450(vi), Dikalsiumdifosfaatti, Dikalsiumdifosfaattia, dikalsiumpyrofosfaatti
fr: E450(vi), Diphosphate dicalcique, Di-hydrogen di-phosphate de calcium, CAS 7790-76-3
hr: E450(vi)
hu: E450(vi), Dikalcium-difoszfát
it: E450(vi), Difosfato di dicalcio
lt: E450(vi), Dikalcio difosfatas
lv: E450(vi), Dikalcija difosfāts
mt: E450(vi), Difosfat dikalċiku
nl: E450(vi), Dicalciumdifosfaat
pl: E450(vi), Difosforan diwapniowy
pt: E450(vi), Difosfato dicálcico
ro: E450(vi), Difosfat dicalcic
sk: E450(vi), Difosforečnan divápenatý
sl: E450(vi), Dikalcijev difosfat
sv: E450(vi), Dikalciumdifosfat

en: E450(vii), Calcium dihydrogen diphosphate, Acid calcium pyrophosphate
xx: E450(vii), e450vii
bg: E450(vii), Калциев дихидроген дифосфат, Кисел калциев пирофосфат
cs: E450(vii), Dihydrogendifosforečnan vápenatý
da: E450(vii), Calciumdihydrogendiphosphat, Surt calciumpyrophosphat
de: E450(vii), Calciumdihydrogendiphosphat, saures Calciumpyrophosphat
el: E450(vii), Δισοξινο πυροφωσφορικο ασβεστιο
es: E450(vii), Difosfato cálcico de dihidrógeno, Pirofosfato ácido de calcio
et: E450(vii), Kaltsiumdivesinikdifosfaat, Kaltsiumdivesinikpürofosfaat
fi: E450(vii), Kalsiumdivetydifosfaatti, Hapan kalsiumpyrofosfaatti, Kalsiumdivetydifosfaattia
fr: E450(vii), Diphosphate biacide de calcium, Dihydrogéno-diphosphate de calcium, Pyrophosphate de calcium acide
hr: E450(vii), kalcijev dihidrogen difosfat
hu: E450(vii), Kalcium-dihidrogén-difoszfát, Savas kalcium-pirofoszfát
it: E450(vii), Di-idrogenodifosfato di calcio, Pirofosfato acido di calcio
lt: E450(vii), Kalcio divandenilio difosfatas, Rūgštusis kalcio pirofosfatas
lv: E450(vii), Kalcija dihidrogendifosfāts, Skābais kalcija pirofosfāts
mt: E450(vii), Difosfat diidroġenat tal-kalċju, Pirofosfat tal-kalċju aċiduż
nl: E450(vii), Calciumdiwaterstofdifosfaat, Zuur calciumpyrofosfaat
pl: E450(vii), Diwodoro-difosforan wapnia, Kwaśny pirofosforan wapnia
pt: E450(vii), Di-hidrogenodifosfato de cálcio, Pirofosfato ácido de cálcio
ro: E450(vii), Difosfat diacid de calciu, Pirofosfat acid de calciu
sk: E450(vii), Dihydrogendifosforečnan divápenatý, Kyslý pyrofosforečnan vápenatý
sl: E450(vii), Kalcijev dihidrogen difosfat, kisel kalcijev pirofosfat
sv: E450(vii), Kalciumdivätedifosfat, Kalciumpyrofosfatsyra

en: E450(viii)
xx: E450(viii)
ar: E450(viii), فوسفات ثنائي المغنيسيوم
az: E450(viii), Dimaqnezium difosfat
bg: E450(viii), Димагнезиев дифосфат
ca: E450(viii), Difosfat de dimagnesi
cs: E450(viii), Dvojsodný difosfát hořečnatý
da: E450(viii), Dimagnesiumdiphosphat
de: E450(viii), Dimagnesiumdiphosphat
el: E450(viii), Διμαγνησιου διφωσφορικό
eo: E450(viii), Dimagnezia difosfato
es: E450(viii), Difosfato de dimagnesio
et: E450(viii), Dimaagnesiumdifosfaat
fa: E450(viii), دی فسفات دی منیزیم
fi: E450(viii), Dimagnesiumdifosfaatti
fr: E450(viii), Diphosphate dimagnésien
he: E450(viii), דיפוספט דימגנזיום
hr: E450(viii), Dimagnezijev difosfat
hu: E450(viii), Difoszfát-dimagnézium
id: E450(viii), Dimagnesium difosfat
it: E450(viii), Difosfato di dimagnesio
ja: E450(viii), リン酸二マグネシウム
ko: E450(viii), 인산이 마그네슘
lt: E450(viii), Dimagnio difosfatas
lv: E450(viii), Dimagnija difosfāts
mk: E450(viii), Димагнезиум дифосфат
ms: E450(viii), Dimagnesium difosfat
mt: E450(viii), Difosfat dimanjeżiku
nl: E450(viii), Dimagnesiumdifosfaat
pl: E450(viii), Difosforan dimagnezu
pt: E450(viii), Difosfato de dimagnésio
ro: E450(viii), Difosfat de dimagneziu
ru: E450(viii), Димагниевый дифосфат
sk: E450(viii), Dihorečnan difosforečnan
sl: E450(viii), Dimagnezijev difosfat
sq: E450(viii), Difosfat dimagnezi
sr: E450(viii), Димагнезијум дифосфат
sv: E450(viii), Dimagnesiumdifosfat
tr: E450(viii), Dimagnezyum difosfat
uk: E450(viii), Димагнієвий дифосфат
zh: E450(viii), 磷酸二镁

en: E450(ix), Magnesium dihydrogen diphosphate
xx: E450(ix)

en: E451, Triphosphates, triphosphate, E 451, e-451
xx: E451
ar: E451, ثلاثي الفوسفات
az: E451, Trifosfatlar
bg: E451, Трифосфати, трифосфат, трифосфати
ca: E451, Trifosfat, trifosfats
cs: E451, Trifosforečnany
da: E451, Triphosphater, Triphosphat
de: E451, Tripolyphosphat, Triphosphate
el: E451, Τριφωσφορικο, Τριπολυφωσφορικό
es: E451, Tripolifosfatos, trifosfatos
et: E451, Trifosfaadid
fi: E451, Trifosfaatit, Trifosfaatteja
fr: E451, Triphosphates, Tripolyphosphates
hr: E451, trifosfati, tripolifosfati, trifosfat, trifosfat pojačivač okusa
hu: E451, Trifoszfátok
it: E451, trifosfati
ja: E451, 三リン酸塩
ko: E451, 삼인산염
lt: E451, Trifosfatai
lv: E451, Trifosfāti
mk: E451, Трифосфати
mt: E451, Trifosfati
nb: E451, Trifosfater, Trifosfat
nl: E451, Trifosfaten, Trifosfaat
pl: E451, Trifosforany, Trifosforan
pt: E451, Trifosfatos, trifosfato, polifosfatos, tripolifosfato
ro: E451, trifosfați
ru: E451, Tрифосфаты
sk: E451, Trifosforečnany
sl: E451, Trifosfati
sr: E451, Трифосфати
sv: E451, Trifosfater, Trifosfat
th: E451, ไตรฟอสเฟต
tr: E451, Trifosfatlar
uk: E451, Трифосфати
zh: E451, 三磷酸盐

en: E451(i), Pentasodium triphosphate, Pentasodium tripolyphosphate, Sodium triphosphate
xx: E451(i), e451i, e 451i, e-451i
bg: E451(i), Пентанатриев трифосфат, Пентанатриев триполифосфат
cs: E451(i), Trifosforečnan pentasodný
da: E451(i), Pentanatriumtriphosphat, Pentanatriumtripolyphosphat
de: E451(i), Pentanatriumtriphosphat, Pentanatriumtripolyphosphat
es: E451(i), Trifosfato de pentasodio, Tripolifosfato pentasódico, trifosfato pentasódico
et: E451(i), Pentanaatriumtrifosfaat, Pentanaatriumtripolüfosfaat
fi: E451(i), Pentanatriumtrifosfaatti, Pentanatriumtripolyfosfaatti, Pentanatriumtrifosfaattia, Pentanatriumtripolyfosfaattia
fr: E451(i), TPP, Triphosphate pentasodique, Tripolyphosphate pentasodique
hr: E451(i)
hu: E451(i), Pentanátrium-trifoszfát, Pentanátrium-tripolifoszfát
it: E451(i), Trifosfato pentasodico, Tripolifosfato pentasodico
lt: E451(i), Pentanatrio trifosfatas, Pentanatrio tripolifosfatas
lv: E451(i), Pentanātrija trifosfāts, Pentanātrija tripolifosfāts
mt: E451(i), Trifosfat pentasodiku, Tripolifosfat pentasodiku
nl: E451(i), Pentanatriumtrifosfaat, Pentanatriumtripolyfosfaat
pl: E451(i), Trifosforan pentasodowy, Trójpolifosforan pięciosodowy, Trifosforan pentasodu
pt: E451(i), Trifosfato pentassódico, Tripolifosfato pentassódico
ro: E451(i), Trifosfat pentasodic, Tripolifosfat pentasodic
sk: E451(i), Trifosforečnan pentasodný, Tripolyfosforečnan pentasodný
sl: E451(i), Pentanatrijev trifosfat, pentanatrijev tripolifosfat
sv: E451(i), Pentanatriumtrifosfat, Pentanatriumtripolyfosfat

en: E451(ii), Pentapotassium triphosphate, potassium triphosphate, potassium tripolyphosphate, KTPP
xx: E451(ii), E451ii, E 451ii, E-451ii
bg: E451(ii), Пентакалиев трифосфат, Пентакалиев триполифосфат, калиев трифосфат
cs: E451(ii), Trifosforečnan pentadraselný
da: E451(ii), Pentakaliumtriphosphat, Pentakaliumtripolyphosphat, kaliumtriphosphat
de: E451(ii), Pentakaliumtriphosphat, Pentakaliumtripolyphosphat, Kaliumtriphosphat
el: E451(ii), Τριφωσφορικο καλιο, Τριπολυφωσφορικό κάλιο, τριφωσφορικό κάλιο
es: E451(ii), Trifosfato de pentapotasio, Tripolifosfato pentapotásico, trifosfato potásico
et: E451(ii), Pentakaaliumtrifosfaat, Pentakaaliumtripolüfosfaat, kaaliumtripolüfosfaat
fi: E451(ii), Pentakaliumtrifosfaatti, Pentakaliumtripolyfosfaatti, Kaliumtrifosfaatti, Pentakaliumtrifosfaattia, Pentakaliumtripolyfosfaattia, Kaliumtrifosfaattia
fr: E451(ii), Triphosphate pentapotassique
hu: E451(ii), Pentakálium-trifoszfát, Pentakálium-tripolifoszfát, Kálium-trifoszfát
it: E451(ii), Trifosfato pentapotassico, Tripolifosfato pentapotassico, trifosfato di potassio
lt: E451(ii), Pentakalio trifosfatas, Pentakalio tripolifosfatas, kalio trifosfatas
lv: E451(ii), Pentakālija trifosfāts, Pentakālija tripolifosfāts, Kālija trifosfāts
mt: E451(ii), Trifosfat pentapotassiku, Tripolifosfat pentapotassiku, Trifosfat tal-potassju
nl: E451(ii), Pentakaliumtrifosfaat, Pentakaliumtripolyfosfaat, kaliumtrifosfaat
pl: E451(ii), Trifosforan pentapotasowy
pt: E451(ii), Trifosfato pentapotássico, Tripolifosfato pentapotássico, trifosfato de potássio
ro: E451(ii), Trifosfat pentapotasic, Tripolifosfat pentapotasic, Trifosfat de potasiu
sk: E451(ii), Trifosforečnan pentadraselný
sl: E451(ii), Pentakalijev trifosfat, pentakalijev tripolifosfat, kalijev trifosfat
sv: E451(ii), Pentakaliumtrifosfat, Pentakaliumtripolyfosfat, kaliumtrifosfat

en: E451(iii), Sodium potassium triphosphate
xx: E451(iii)

en: E452, Polyphosphates, Polyphosphate E452
xx: E452, e 452, e-452
ar: E452, متعدد الفوسفات
az: E452, Polifosfatlar
bg: E452, Полифосфати, полифосфат
ca: E452, Polifosfat, Polifosfats
cs: E452, Polyfosforečnany
da: E452, Polyphosphater
de: E452, Polyphosphate
el: E452, Πολυφωσφορικά άλατα
eo: E452, Polifosfatoj
es: E452, Polifosfatos, polifosfato
et: E452, Polüfosfaadid
fa: E452, پلی فسفات
fi: E452, Polyfosfaatit, Polyfosfaatteja
fr: E452, Polyphosphates, polyphosphate
ga: E452, Polaifosfáit
gl: E452, Polifosfatos
he: E452, פוליפוספטים
hr: E452, polifosfat, polifosfati
hu: E452, polifoszfátok, polifoszfát
id: E452, Polifosfat
it: E452, Polifosfati
ja: E452, ポリリン酸塩
ko: E452, 폴리인산염
lt: E452, Polifosfatai
lv: E452, Polifosfāti
mk: E452, Полифосфати
mt: E452, Polifosfati
nl: E452, Polyfosfaten
pl: E452, Polifosforany
pt: E452, Polifosfato
ro: E452, Polifosfați
ru: E452, Полифосфаты
sk: E452, Polyfosforečnany
sl: E452, Polifosfati
sr: E452, Полифосфати
sv: E452, Polyfosfater
th: E452, โพลีฟอสเฟต
tr: E452, Polifosfatlar
uk: E452, Поліфосфати
vi: E452, Polyphosphat
zh: E452, 多磷酸盐

en: E452(i), Sodium polyphosphate, sodium hexametaphosphate, sodium polymetaphosphate
xx: E452(i), e452i, e 452i, e-452i
bg: E452(i), Натриев полифосфат
cs: E452(i), Polyfosforečnan sodný
da: E452(i), Natriumpolyphosphater
de: E452(i), Natriumpolyphosphat
el: E452(i), Πολυφωσφορικο νατριο
es: E452(i), Polifosfato de sodio, Polifosfato sódico
et: E452(i), Naatriumpolüfosfaat
fi: E452(i), Natriumpolyfosfaatti, Natriumpolyfosfaatteja
fr: E452(i), Polyphosphate de sodium, Sel de Maddrell, Sel de Graham, Polyphosphates de sodium vitreux, Polyphosphates de sodium, Polyphosphate sodique, Polyphosphate de sodium insoluble, Polymétaphosphate de sodium, Métaphosphate de sodium insoluble, Métaphosphate de sodium, IMP, Héxamétaphosphate de sodium, Tétrapolyphosphate de sodium, Polyphosphate de sodium
hr: E452(i), natrijev polifosfat
hu: E452(i), Nátrium-polifoszfát
it: E452(i), Polifosfato di sodio
lt: E452(i), Natrio polifosfatas
lv: E452(i), Nātrija polifosfāts
mt: E452(i), Polifosfat tas-sodju
nl: E452(i), Natriumpolyfosfaat
pl: E452(i), Polifosforan sodu
pt: E452(i), Sodium polyphosphate, polifosfato de sódio
ro: E452(i), Polifosfat de sodiu
sk: E452(i), Polyfosforečnan sodný
sl: E452(i), Natrijev polifosfat
sv: E452(i), Natriumpolyfosfat

en: E452(ii), Potassium polyphosphate, Potassium metaphosphate, Potassium polymetaphosphate
xx: E452(ii), E452ii, E 452ii, E-452ii
bg: E452(ii), Калиев полифосфат, Калиев метафосфат, калиев полиметафосфат
cs: E452(ii), Polyfosforečnan draselný
da: E452(ii), Kaliumpolyphosphater, Kaliummetaphosphat, kaliumpolymetaphosphat
de: E452(ii), Kaliumpolyphosphat, Kaliummetaphosphat, Kaliumpolymetaphosphat
el: E452(ii), Πολυφωσφορικο καλιο, Μεταφωσφορικό κάλιο, πολυμεταφωσφορικό κάλιο
es: E452(ii), Polifosfato de potasio, Metafosfato potásico, polimetafosfato potásico
et: E452(ii), Kaaliumpolüfosfaat, Kaaliummetafosfaat, kaaliumpolümetafosfaat
fi: E452(ii), Kaliumpolyfosfaatti, Kaliummetafosfaatti, Kaliumpolymetafosfaatti, Kaliumpolyfosfaattia, Kaliummetafosfaattia, Kaliumpolymetafosfaattia
fr: E452(ii), Polyphosphate potassique, Métaphosphate de potassium, polymétaphosphate de potassium, Polyphosphates de potassium, Polyphosphate de potassium, Sel de Kurrol
hr: E452(ii), kalijev polifosfat
hu: E452(ii), Kálium-polifoszfát, Kálium-metafoszfát, Kálium-polimetafoszfát
it: E452(ii), Polifosfato di potassio, Metafosfato di potassio, polimetafosfato di potassio
lt: E452(ii), Kalio polifosfatas, Kalio metafosfatas, kalio polimetafosfatas
lv: E452(ii), Kālija polifosfāts, Kālija metafosfāts, Kālija polimetafosfāts
mt: E452(ii), Polifosfat tal-potassju, Metafosfat tal-potassju, Polimetafosfat tal-potassju
nl: E452(ii), Kaliumpolyfosfaat, Kaliummetafosfaat, kaliumpolymetafosfaat
pl: E452(ii), Polifosforan potasu, Metafosforan potasu, polimetafosforan potasu
pt: E452(ii), polifosfato de potássio, Metafosfato de potássio, polimetafosfato de potássio
ro: E452(ii), Polifosfat de potasiu, Metafosfat de potasiu, Polimetafosfat de potasiu
sk: E452(ii), Polyfosforečnan draselný, Metafosforečnan draselný, polymetafosforečnan draselný
sl: E452(ii), Kalijev polifosfat, kalijev metafosfat, kalijev polimetafosfat
sv: E452(ii), Kaliumpolyfosfat, Kaliummetafosfat, kaliumpolymetafosfat

en: E452(iii), Sodium calcium polyphosphate, Sodium calcium polyphosphate
xx: E452(iii), E452iii, E 452iii, E-452iii
bg: E452(iii), Натриево-калциев полифосфат, Натриево-калциев полифосфат
cs: E452(iii), Polyfosforečnan sodno-vápenatý
da: E452(iii), Natriumcalciumpolyphosphater, Natriumcalciumpolyphosphat
de: E452(iii), Natriumcalciumpolyphosphat
el: E452(iii), Πολυφωσφορικο νατριοασβεστιο, Πολυφωσφορικό νατριοασβέστιο
es: E452(iii), Polifosfato de sodio y calcio, Polifosfato de sodio y calcio
et: E452(iii), Naatriumkaltsiumpolüfosfaat
fi: E452(iii), Natriumkalsiumpolyfosfaatti, Natriumkalsiumpolyfosfaatti, Natriumkalsiumpolyfosfaattia, Natriumkalsiumpolyfosfaattia
fr: E452(iii), Polyphosphate de sodium-calcium, Polyphosphate calco-sodique
hu: E452(iii), Nátrium-kalcium-polifoszfát, Nátrium-kalcium-polifoszfát
it: E452(iii), Polifosfato di sodio e calcio
lt: E452(iii), Natrio kalcio polifosfatas, Natrio kalcio polifosfatas
lv: E452(iii), Nātrija kalcija polifosfāts, Nātrija kalcija polifosfāts
mt: E452(iii), Polifosfat tal-kalċju u tas-sodju
nl: E452(iii), Natriumcalciumpolyfosfaat, Natriumcalciumpolyfosfaat
pl: E452(iii), Polifosforan sodowo-wapniowy, Polifosforan sodowo-wapniowy
pt: E452(iii), Polifosfato de sódio e cálcio
ro: E452(iii), Polifosfat de sodiu și calciu, Polifosfat de sodiu și calciu
sk: E452(iii), Polyfosforečnan sodno-vápenatý
sl: E452(iii), Natrijev kalcijev polifosfat, natrijev kalcijev polifosfat
sv: E452(iii), Natriumkalciumpolyfosfat

en: E452(iv), Calcium polyphosphate, Calcium metaphosphate
xx: E452(iv), e452iv, e 452iv, e-452iv
bg: E452(iv), Калциев полифосфат, Калциев метафосфат
cs: E452(iv), Polyfosforečnan vápenatý, Metafosforečnan vápenatý
da: E452(iv), Calciumpolyphosphater, Calciummetaphosphat
de: E452(iv), Calciumpolyphosphat, Calciummetaphosphat
el: E452(iv), Πολυφωσφορικο ασβεστιο, Μεταφωσφορικό ασβέστιο
es: E452(iv), Polifosfato de calcio, Metafosfato cálcico
et: E452(iv), Kaltsiumpolüfosfaat, Kaltsiummetafosfaat
fi: E452(iv), Kalsiumpolyfosfaatti, Kalsiummetafosfaatti, Kalsiumpolyfosfaattia, Kalsiummetafosfaattia
fr: E452(iv), Polyphosphate de calcium, Polyphosphate calcique, Polymétaphosphate de calcium, Métaphosphate de calcium
hr: E452(iv), kalcijev polifosfat
hu: E452(iv), Kalcium-polifoszfát, Kalcium-metafoszfát
it: E452(iv), Polifosfato di calcio, Metafosfato di calcio
lt: E452(iv), Kalcio polifosfatas, Kalcio metafosfatas
lv: E452(iv), Kalcija polifosfāts, Kalcija metafosfāts
mt: E452(iv), Polifosfat tal-kalċju, Metafosfat tal-kalċju
nl: E452(iv), Calciumpolyfosfaat, Calciummetafosfaat
pl: E452(iv), Polifosforan wapnia, Metafosforan wapnia
pt: E452(iv), Polifosfato de cálcio, Metafosfato de cálcio
ro: E452(iv), Polifosfat de calciu, Metafosfat de calciu
sk: E452(iv), Polyfosforečnan vápenatý, Metafosforečnan vápenatý
sl: E452(iv), Kalcijev polifosfat, kalcijev metafosfat
sv: E452(iv), Kalciumpolyfosfat, Kalciummetafosfat

en: E452(v), Ammonium polyphosphate
xx: E452(v), E452v, e 452v, e-452v
ar: E452(v), بولي فوسفات الأمونيوم
az: E452(v), Ammonium polifosfat
bg: E452(v), Амониев полифосфат
ca: E452(v), Polifosfat d'amoni
cs: E452(v), Polyfosforečnan amonný
da: E452(v), Ammoniumpolyphosphat
de: E452(v), Ammoniumpolyphosphat
el: E452(v), Πολυφωσφορικό αμμώνιο
eo: E452(v), Amonia polifosfato
es: E452(v), Polifosfato de amonio
et: E452(v), Ammooniumpolüfosfaat
fa: E452(v), پلی فسفات آمونیوم
fi: E452(v), Ammoniumpolyfosfaatti, Ammoniumpolyfosfaattia
fr: E452(v), Polyphosphate d'ammonium
he: E452(v), פוליפוספט אמוניום
hr: E452(v), Amonijev polifosfat
hu: E452(v), Ammónium-polifoszfát
id: E452(v), Ammonium polifosfat
it: E452(v), Polifosfato di ammonio
ja: E452(v), ポリリン酸アンモニウム
ko: E452(v), 폴리인산 암모늄
lt: E452(v), Amonio polifosfatas
lv: E452(v), Amonija polifosfāts
mk: E452(v), Амониум полифосфат
mt: E452(v), Polifosfat tal-ammonju
nl: E452(v), Ammoniumpolyfosfaat, Polyammoniumfosfaat
pl: E452(v), Polifosforan amonu
pt: E452(v), Polifosfato de amónio
ro: E452(v), Polifosfat de amoniu
ru: E452(v), Полифосфат аммония
sk: E452(v), Polyfosforečnan amónny
sl: E452(v), Amonijev polifosfat
sr: E452(v), Амонијум полифосфат
sv: E452(v), Ammoniumpolyfosfat
tr: E452(v), Amonyum polifosfat
uk: E452(v), Поліфосфат амонію
zh: E452(v), 聚磷酸铵

en: E452(vi), Sodium tripolyphosphate
xx: E452(vi), E452vi, E 452vi, E-452vi
ar: E452(vi), ثلاثي فوسفات الصوديوم
az: E452(vi), Natrium tripolifosfat
bg: E452(vi), Натриев триполифосфат
ca: E452(vi), Tripolifosfat de sodi
cs: E452(vi), Tripolyfosforečnan sodný
da: E452(vi), Natriumtripolyphosphat
de: E452(vi), Natriumtripolyphosphat
el: E452(vi), Τριπολυφωσφορικό νάτριο
eo: E452(vi), Natria tripolifosfato
es: E452(vi), Tripolifosfato de sodio
et: E452(vi), Naatriumtripolüfosfaat
fa: E452(vi), تری پلی فسفات سدیم
fi: E452(vi), Natriumtripolyfosfaatti, Natriumtripolyfosfaattia
fr: E452(vi), Tripolyphosphate de sodium et de potassium
he: E452(vi), טריפוליפוספט נתרן
hr: E452(vi), Natrijev tripolifosfat
hu: E452(vi), nátrium-tripolifoszfát
id: E452(vi), Natrium tripolifosfat
it: E452(vi), Tripolifosfato di sodio
ja: E452(vi), ポリリン酸ナトリウム
ko: E452(vi), 폴리인산 나트륨
lt: E452(vi), Natrio tripolifosfatas
lv: E452(vi), Nātrija tripolifosfāts
mk: E452(vi), Натриум триполифосфат
mt: E452(vi), Tripolifosfat tas-sodju
nl: E452(vi), Natriumtripolyfosfaat
pl: E452(vi), Tripolifosforan sodu
pt: E452(vi), Tripolifosfato de sódio
ro: E452(vi), Tripolifosfat de sodiu
ru: E452(vi), Триполифосфат натрия
sk: E452(vi), Tripolyfosforečnan sodný
sl: E452(vi), Natrijev tripolifosfat
sr: E452(vi), Натријум триполифосфат
sv: E452(vi), Natriumtripolyfosfat
tr: E452(vi), Sodyum tripolifosfat
uk: E452(vi), Триполіфосфат натрію
zh: E452(vi), 三聚磷酸钠

en: E457, Alpha-Cyclodextrine
xx: E457
ar: E457, ألفا سيكلودكسترين
az: E457, Alfa-Siklodekstrin
bg: E457, Алфа-циклодекстрин
ca: E457, Alfa-ciclodextrina
cs: E457, Alfa-cyklodextrin
da: E457, Alfa-cyclodextrin
de: E457, Alpha-Cyclodextrin
el: E457, Άλφα-κυκλοδεξτρίνη
eo: E457, Alfa-ciklodekstrino
es: E457, Alfa-ciclodextrina
et: E457, Alfa-tsüklodekstriin
fi: E457, Alfa-syklodekstriini, Alfa-syklodekstriiniä
fr: E457, Alpha-Cyclodextrine
hr: E457, Alfa-ciklodekstrin
hu: E457, alfa-ciklodextrin
it: E457, Alfa-ciclodestrina
ja: E457, アルファ-シクロデキストリン
ko: E457, 알파-사이클로덱스트린
lt: E457, Alfa-ciklodekstrinas
lv: E457, Alfa-ciklodekstrīns
nl: E457, Alfa-cyclodextrine
pl: E457, Alfa-cyklodekstryna
pt: E457, Alfa-ciclodextrina
ro: E457, Alfa-ciclodextrină
ru: E457, Альфа-циклодекстрин
sk: E457, Alfa-cyklodextrín
sl: E457, Alfa-ciklodekstrin
sv: E457, Alfa-cyklodextrin
tr: E457, Alfa-Siklodekstrin
zh: E457, α-环糊精

en: E458, Gamma-Cyclodextrine
xx: E458
ar: E458, غاما سيكلودكسترين
az: E458, Gamma-Siklodekstrin
bg: E458, Гама-циклодекстрин
ca: E458, Gamma-ciclodextrina
cs: E458, Gama-cyklodextrin
da: E458, Gamma-cyclodextrin
de: E458, Gamma-Cyclodextrin
el: E458, Γάμμα-κυκλοδεξτρίνη
eo: E458, Gama-ciklodekstrino
es: E458, Gamma-ciclodextrina
et: E458, Gamma-tsüklodekstriin
fi: E458, Gamma-Syklodekstriini, Gamma-Syklodekstriiniä
fr: E458, Gamma-Cyclodextrine
hr: E458, Gama-ciklodekstrin
hu: E458, gamma-ciklodextrin
it: E458, Gamma-ciclodestrina
ja: E458, ガンマ-シクロデキストリン
ko: E458, 감마-사이클로덱스트린
lt: E458, Gama-ciklodekstrinas
lv: E458, Gamma-ciklodekstrīns
mt: E458, Gamma-ċiklodextrin
nl: E458, Gamma-cyclodextrine
pl: E458, Gamma-cyklodekstryna
pt: E458, Gama-ciclodextrina
ro: E458, Gama-ciclodextrină
ru: E458, Гамма-циклодекстрин
sk: E458, Gama-cyklodextrín
sl: E458, Gama-ciklodekstrin
sv: E458, Gamma-cyklodextrin
tr: E458, Gama-Siklodekstrin
zh: E458, γ-环糊精